California, session 20252026, SB777.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7612.12 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:7612.12. (a) On or before March 1, 2026, the bureau shall convene a workgroup composed of interested stakeholders including, but not limited to, representatives from the cemetery industry, the California Association of Local Agency Formation Commissions, the League of California Cities, the California State Association of Counties, the Urban Counties of California, the Rural County Representatives of California, public cemeteries, and legislative staff for the appropriate committees of the Legislature, to discuss options for ensuring continued care, maintenance, and embellishment of abandoned cemeteries, including the possibility of requiring counties to assume responsibility for maintenance, irrigation, public works, and burial services for cemeteries located within their boundaries that become abandoned.(b) In accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the bureau shall submit a report to the Legislature summarizing the discussions of the workgroup and its recommendations no later than June 1, 2026.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.